South Dakota, session 2026, HB1017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-28:
A school board may assign a student to receive instruction in an alternative setting
for aggressive or violent behaviors that disrupt the school or that affect a health or safety
factor of the school or its program. Nothing herein may be construed to limit enrollment
options provided in § 13-28-40 or conflict with provisions of the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400, et seq., or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation
Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-28:
On or before the second Friday of June of each year, the board of a school district
shall report to the Department of Education, on the form prescribed by the department,
the students who were assigned to receive instruction in an alternative setting during the
school year.
The department may disclose information contained in the report only if the data
has been:
(1) Anonymized; and
(2) Aggregated with the data reported by all other school districts.

26.368.20 2 1017
An Act to permit the board of a school district to require that certain students receive
instruction in alternative settings.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1017
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1017 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1017 ENROLLED